Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-201
Act, how cited.

Sections 58-201 to 58-274 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 1230, § 29;

Laws 1989, LB 311, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 706, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1322, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 1211, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 693, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 73;

Laws 2026, LB768, § 1.
July 18, 2026